Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 59
INEDIBLE MEAT RENDERING AND PROCESSING ACT

35-59-101 to 35-59-113. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire article repealed, (HB 12-1158), ch. 13, p. 33, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 21 of chapter 8, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2012, consult the 2011 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.